District of Columbia statutes.
38-1947

Repealed

Report of person on leave; termination of leave.

Repealed.

June 12, 1940, 54 Stat. 349, ch. 342, § 2
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 17, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1012.
1973 Ed., § 31-633.